Virginia statutes. Title 25. Eminent Domain.
§§ 25-1 through 25-254.

Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 940, cl. 8, effective July 1, 2003.

Cross references.

For note regarding the recodification of Title 25 as new Title 25.1, and accompanying revisions of other material, see Editor’s note under §

25.1-100

.

Editor’s note.

Sections

25-1

to 25-46 were repealed by Acts 1962, c. 426.